California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 cemetery manager, funeral director, embalmer, crematorium licensee, or other person licensed to provide services related to cemeteries and funerals has been divested of his or her ownership interest in the limited liability company or has voluntarily surrendered his or her license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7613.6.

The bureau may administer oaths and examine under oath any person relative to the endowment care fund. The examination shall be conducted in the principal office of the person or body in charge of the endowment care fund and shall be private.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7613.7.

If any examination made by the bureau, or any report filed with it, shows that there has not been collected and deposited in the endowment care funds the minimum amounts required by the Health and Safety Code since September 19, 1939, the bureau shall require a cemetery corporation to comply with Sections 8743 and 8744 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7613.8.

Whenever the bureau finds, after notice and hearing, that any endowment care funds have been invested in violation of the Health and Safety Code, it shall by written order mailed to the person or body in charge of the fund require the reinvestment of the funds in conformity to that code within a period which shall be not less than two years if the investment was made prior to October 1, 1949, not less than six months if the investment was made on or after October 1, 1949, and before the effective date of the amendment of this section by the 1969 Regular Session of the Legislature, and not less than 30 days if the investment is made on or after the effective date of the amendment. The period may be extended by the bureau in its discretion.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7613.9.

The superior court of the county in which the principal office of the cemetery authority in charge of endowment care funds is located shall, upon the filing by the bureau of a verified application showing any of the following conditions hereinafter enumerated to exist, issue its order vesting title to any endowment care funds of a cemetery authority in the bureau, and directing the bureau forthwith to take possession of all necessary books, records, property, real and personal, and assets, and to conduct as conservator, the management of such endowment care funds, or so much thereof as to the bureau may seem appropriate:

(a) That the cemetery authority has refused to submit its books, papers, accounts, or affairs to the reasonable examination of the bureau.

(b) That the cemetery authority has neglected to observe an order of the bureau to make good within the time prescribed by law any deficiency in its investments of endowment care funds.

(c) That the cemetery authority is found, after an examination, to be in such condition that its further management of its endowment care funds will be hazardous to its members, plotholders, or to the public.

(d) That the cemetery authority has violated its articles of incorporation or any law of the state.

(e) That any officer, director, agent, servant, or employee of the cemetery authority person refuses to be examined under oath relative to the endowment care funds thereof.

(f) That any person has embezzled or otherwise wrongfully diverted any of the endowment care funds of the cemetery authority.

(g) The order shall continue in force and effect until, on the application either of the bureau or of the cemetery authority, it shall, after
 a full hearing, appear to the court that the ground for the order does not exist or has been removed and that the cemetery authority can properly resume title and possession of its property and the management of its endowment care funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7613.10.

When it has been alleged by verified petition pursuant to Section 7613.1 or when the bureau on its own investigation determines that there is probable cause to believe that any of the conditions set forth in Section 7613.9 exist or that irreparable loss and injury to the endowment care funds of a cemetery authority has occurred or may occur unless the bureau so acts immediately, the bureau, without notice and before applying to the court for any order, may take possession of the endowment care funds and the books, records, and accounts relating thereto of the cemetery authority, and retain possession subject to the order of the court. Any person having possession of and refusing to deliver any assets,
 books, or records of a cemetery authority against which a seizure order has been issued by the bureau shall be guilty of a
 misdemeanor and punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7613.11.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 7613.9 and 7613.10, 90 days following the cancellation, surrender, or revocation of a certificate of authority, the bureau shall take title of any endowment care funds of the cemetery authority, take possession of all necessary books, records, property, real and personal, and assets, and act as conservator over the management of the endowment care funds in a manner consistent with Article 2 (commencing with Section 8725) of Chapter 5 of Part 3 of Division 8 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) The bureau shall appoint as sole trustee of the endowment care fund a bank or trust company authorized under Division 1 (commencing with Section 99) of the Financial Code to engage in the trust business. Notwithstanding Section
 8733 of the Health and Safety Code, the sum paid to the bank or trust company appointed by the bureau may exceed 5 percent of the net income derived from the endowment care fund, special care fund, or both.

(c) This section shall not apply if ownership of the cemetery is transferred in accordance with Section 8585 of the Health and Safety Code within 90 days of the cancellation, surrender, or revocation of the certificate of authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 589, Sec. 5.   (AB 3254)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7614.

If any city, county, or city and county exercises its authority to address public health, safety, or welfare issues in connection with a cemetery within its jurisdiction and if the certificate of authority of the cemetery has been revoked or suspended or has not been renewed, and the bureau holds the endowment care fund of the certificate of authority under applicable provisions of this code, the costs of any action that constitutes care, maintenance, or embellishment of the cemetery within the meaning of Section 8726 of the Health and Safety Code shall be eligible for reimbursement from available income from any endowment care fund in existence for the cemetery. For purposes of this section, local jurisdiction action may be based on charter,
 ordinance, or inherent police powers. Any claim for money or damages for an act or omission by the local jurisdiction acting in accord with this section shall be subject to all otherwise applicable immunities contained in Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7614.1.

Whenever the bureau makes any seizure as provided in Section 7613.10, it shall, on demand of the bureau, be the duty of the sheriff of any county of this state, and of the police department of any municipal corporation therein, to furnish the bureau with deputies, patrolmen, or officers as may be necessary to assist the bureau in making and enforcing that seizure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7614.2.

Immediately after effecting a seizure pursuant to Section 7613.10, the bureau shall institute a proceeding as provided for in Section 7613.9.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7614.3.

Notwithstanding any other law, the bureau shall be the custodian of all moneys collected or surrendered pursuant to Sections 7613.9 and 7613.10. As custodian, the bureau may deposit those moneys, or any part thereof, without court approval, in any of the following: a bank or trust company legally authorized and empowered by the state to act as a trustee in the handling of trust funds; in a centralized State Treasury system bank account; or in funds administered by the State Treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7614.4.

The bureau shall maintain, regulate, operate, and control the property situated in the County of Amador, referred to as the Elkin Property in Judicial Council Coordination Proceedings Nos. 1814 and 1817, Order Re Proposed Neptune Memorial, Disposition of the Elkin Property, and Order Re Final Disposition of Ashes of the Sacramento Superior Court, and legally described as “Parcel 16-B as shown on the certain Record or Survey for Eugene S. Lowrance, et ux, filed for record May 17, 1971, in Book 17 of Maps and Plats at page 87, Amador County Records.” The bureau shall administer and supervise endowment funds established by the court for the property. The bureau shall exercise the authority granted by this section for the sole purpose of
 protecting the human remains resting on the property and preserving the property in its natural state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7614.5.

The bureau is authorized to bring action to enforce the provisions of the law subject to its jurisdiction, in which actions it shall be represented by the Attorney General.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7614.6.

The bureau shall enforce and administer Part 1 (commencing with Section 8100), Part 3 (commencing with Section 8250), and Part 5 (commencing with Section 9501) of Division 8 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7614.7.

In any report to the bureau, all bonds, debentures, or other evidences of debt held by a cemetery corporation if amply secured and if not in default as to principal or interest may be valued as follows:

(a) If purchased at par at the par value.

(b) If purchased above or below par on the basis of the purchase price adjusted so as to bring the value to par at maturity and so as to yield the effective rate of interest on the basis at which the purchase was made.

(c) In such valuation, the purchase price shall in no case be taken at a higher figure than the actual market value at the time of purchase.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7614.8.

Any security or other evidence of debt if in default as to principal or interest or if not amply secured shall not be valued as an asset of the endowment care fund above its market value.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7614.9.

Notwithstanding any other law, every cemetery authority shall present to the survivor of the deceased who is handling the burial or cremation arrangements or the responsible party a copy of any preneed agreement that has been signed and paid in full, or in part, by or on behalf of the deceased and is in the possession of the cemetery authority. The copy may be presented in person, by certified mail, or by facsimile transmission, as agreed upon by the survivor of the deceased or the responsible party. A cemetery authority who knowingly fails to present the preneed agreement to the survivor of the deceased or the responsible party shall be liable for a civil fine equal to three times the cost of the preneed agreement, or one thousand dollars
 ($1,000),
 whichever is greater.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Funeral Establishments and Directors [7615. - 7636.]

7615.

A funeral director is a person engaged in or conducting, or holding himself or herself out as engaged in any of the following:

(a) Preparing for the transportation or burial or disposal, or directing and supervising for transportation or burial or disposal of human remains.

(b) Maintaining an establishment for the preparation for the transportation or disposition or for the care of human remains.

(c) Using, in connection with his or her name, the words “funeral director,” or “undertaker,” or “mortician,” or any other title implying that he or she is engaged as a funeral director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1151, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

7616.

(a) A licensed funeral establishment is a place of business conducted in a building or separate portion of a building having a specific street address or location and devoted exclusively to those activities as are incident, convenient, or related to the preparation and arrangements, financial and otherwise, for the funeral, transportation, burial or other disposition of human remains and including, but not
 limited to, either of the following:

(1) A suitable room for the storage of human remains.

(2) A preparation room equipped with a sanitary flooring and necessary drainage and ventilation and containing necessary instruments and supplies for the preparation, sanitation, or embalming of human remains for burial or transportation.

(b) Licensed funeral establishments under common ownership or by contractual agreement within close geographical proximity of each other shall be deemed to be in compliance with the requirements of paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) if at least one of the establishments has a room described in those paragraphs.

(c) Except as provided in Section 7609, and except accredited mortuary science programs engaged in teaching
 students the art of embalming, no person shall operate or maintain or hold himself or herself out as operating or maintaining any of the facilities specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), unless he or she is licensed as a funeral director.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a funeral establishment to conduct its business or financial transactions at the same location as its preparation or storage of human remains.

(e) Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to render unlawful the conduct of any ambulance service from the same premises as those on which a licensed funeral establishment is conducted, including the maintenance in connection with the funeral establishment of garages for the ambulances and living quarters for ambulance drivers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 308, Sec. 86.5.   (SB 819)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

7616.2.

A licensed funeral establishment shall at all times employ a licensed funeral director to manage, direct, or control its business or profession. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, licensed funeral establishments within close geographical proximity of each other, may request the bureau to allow a licensed funeral director to manage, direct, or control the business or profession of more than one facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 568, Sec. 103.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7617.

The business of a licensed funeral establishment shall be conducted and engaged in at a fixed place or facility.

No person, partnership, association, corporation, or other organization shall open or maintain a place or establishment at which to engage in or conduct, or hold himself or herself or itself out as engaging in or conducting, the business of a funeral establishment without a license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1151, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

7617.1.

The applicant for a funeral establishment license, or in the case the applicant is an association, partnership, or corporation, all officers of the corporation or association or all general partners of the partnership shall be at least 18 years of age and shall not have committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 305, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

7618.

An application for a funeral director’s license shall be written on a form provided by the bureau, verified by the applicant, accompanied by the fee fixed by this chapter and filed at its Sacramento office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 568, Sec. 104.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7619.

The applicant for a funeral director’s license shall be at least 18 years of age, possess an associate of arts or science degree, or the equivalent, or a higher level of education as recognized by the Western Association of Colleges and Universities, or any other nationally recognized accrediting body of colleges and universities, and shall not have committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1151, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

7619.3.

No licensed funeral director shall engage in or conduct, or hold himself or herself out as engaging in or conducting, the activities of a funeral director without being employed by, or without being a sole proprietor of, a licensed funeral establishment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1151, Sec. 7.5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

7622.

Before an individual is granted a funeral director’s license, he or she shall successfully pass an examination upon the following subjects:

(a) The signs of death.

(b) The manner by which death may be determined.

(c) The laws governing the preparation, burial and disposal of human remains, and the shipment of bodies dying from infectious or contagious diseases.

(d) Local health and sanitary ordinances and regulations relating to funeral directing and embalming.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1151, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

7622.2.

A person shall not open or maintain a place or establishment at which to engage in or conduct, or hold himself, herself, or itself out as engaging in or conducting, the activities of a funeral director without a license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 17.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7622.5.

An applicant for examination under Section 7622 shall pay the funeral director’s examination fee fixed by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1338.)
-------------------------------------------

7623.

If an applicant for a funeral establishment license proposes to engage in or conduct more than one funeral establishment, the applicant shall make a separate application and procure a separate license for each separate establishment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 305, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

7624.

Not more than one person, partnership, association, corporation, or other organization engaged in business as a funeral establishment shall transact business in one specific funeral facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1151, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

7625.

Upon receipt of an application for a license, the bureau shall cause an investigation to be made of the physical status or plans and specifications of the proposed funeral establishment, and of the other qualifications required of the applicant under this chapter, and for this purpose may subpoena witnesses, administer oaths, and take testimony.

The bureau shall grant a license if it finds that the proposed funeral establishment is or will be constructed and equipped as required by this chapter and that the applicant is
 qualified in all other respects as required by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 568, Sec. 107.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7626.

The bureau shall examine and pass upon the qualifications of the applicant as to ability and experience before passing upon the physical status or plans and specifications of the proposed funeral establishment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 568, Sec. 108.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7626.5.

Where a hearing is held to determine whether an application for a license should be granted, the proceeding shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the bureau shall have all of the powers granted therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 568, Sec. 109.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7627.

Every application for a funeral director’s license under this article shall be granted or refused within ninety days from the date of the filing of the application or within thirty days after the close of the hearing upon the application, in case a hearing is held.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 39.)
-------------------------------------------

7628.

Any person, partnership, association, corporation, or other organization desiring to change the location of a licensed funeral establishment shall apply therefor on forms furnished by the bureau and shall include a fee fixed by this chapter.

The application shall be granted by the bureau upon the filing with the bureau of a favorable report from an inspector concerning the physical status or plans and specifications of the proposed licensed funeral establishment to the effect that it conforms to the requirements of this
 article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 568, Sec. 110.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7629.

No funeral establishment shall be conducted or held forth as being conducted or advertised as being conducted under any name which might tend to mislead the public or which would be sufficiently like the name of any other licensed funeral establishment so as to constitute an unfair method of competition.

Any funeral director desiring to change the name appearing on his or her license may
 do so by applying to the bureau and paying the fee fixed by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 308, Sec. 87.   (SB 819)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

7630.

(a) A funeral establishment’s license may be assigned upon payment of the fee fixed by this chapter, the filing of a completed application, and upon submission of an audit report prepared and signed by an independent certified public accountant or public accountant currently licensed in this state. The audit report shall include an unqualified opinion on the accuracy of the trust fund balances and a report of
 compliance with the provisions of this article and Article 9 (commencing with Section 7735). Any shortages in the trust funds shall be funded.

(b) (1) If the applicant cannot submit the audit report required in subdivision (a) due to estate matters or litigation for which the director or his or her designee is a party, the applicant may request approval from the bureau to secure a bond by an admitted surety insurer guaranteeing the payment to each account of any shortages in the trust funds. Along with the fee and the application to assign the license and transfer ownership, any applicant requesting an exception to subdivision (a) shall submit to the bureau a report, signed by an authorized representative, setting forth the reasons requested for the exception to the audit requirement and a list of all trust accounts for the funeral establishment showing the corpus of the trust, accumulated income, and current account
 balances for each account. If the bureau approves the request to secure a bond, the bureau shall notify the applicant of the approval and of the requirements of this section.

(2) Any applicant who knowingly provides false or misleading information pursuant to the requirements of this subdivision shall be subject to an administrative citation, which may include an order of abatement and a fine in an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation, in addition to any other remedies that may be available to the bureau for violations of this chapter.

(3) Within 30 days from the date of the approval by the bureau, the applicant shall file satisfactory proof of the posting of a bond meeting the requirements of this section with the bureau. Once satisfactory proof of the bond is filed with the bureau and any other requirements for assignment have been met, the funeral
 establishment’s license may be assigned.

(c) Any applicant that obtains approval from the bureau to post a bond shall obtain a bond that is in an amount equal to 50 percent greater than the corpus of the trust and otherwise meet the requirements of this chapter. Within one year from the date of acceptance of the surety bond by the bureau and prior to the expiration of the current bond, the funeral establishment shall file a new request with the bureau to post another bond and receive approval by the bureau consistent with the requirements set forth in subdivision (b). This requirement shall be met for each year in which the assignee fails to submit an audit report and fund any shortages as required in subdivision (a).

(d) The assignee shall comply with all provisions previously placed on the assignor. The assignee shall maintain the bond referred to in this section after
 assignment of the funeral establishment’s license by the bureau.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 364, Sec. 1.   (AB 374)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7631.

In case of the death of a licensed funeral director who leaves a funeral establishment as part or all of the assets of his or her estate, the bureau may issue a temporary license to his or her legal representative, unless the legal representative has committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480. A temporary establishment license is valid for six months from the date of issue. However, upon the petition of the estate’s legal representative, the bureau, in its discretion, may grant a reasonable extension to allow for the
 assets of the estate to be distributed as circumstances warrant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 874, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7632.

A funeral director shall cause all human remains embalmed in or at the direction of his or her funeral establishment to be embalmed by a licensed embalmer, by an apprentice embalmer under the supervision of his or her licensed supervising embalmer, or by a student in a program accredited by the American Board of Funeral Service Education under the supervision of a licensed embalmer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

7633.

No funeral director shall charge a fee for filing a certificate of death or for providing copies thereof in excess of fees set by statute for filing and providing certified copies of such certificates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 557.)
-------------------------------------------

7634.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a licensed embalmer, at the request of a licensed physician, may remove tissue from human remains for transplant, or therapeutic, or scientific purposes specified in, and pursuant to, the provisions of the Uniform Anatomical Gift Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 7150) of Part 1 of Division 7 of the Health and Safety Code), if such embalmer has completed a course in tissue removal for transplant, or therapeutic, or scientific purposes approved by the Medical Board of California of the State of
 California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 970, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7635.

(a) Any person employed by, or an agent of, a licensed funeral establishment, who consults with the family or representatives of a family of a deceased person for the purpose of arranging for services as set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 7615, shall receive documented training and instruction, at least once every three years, that results in a demonstrated knowledge of all applicable federal and state laws, rules,
 and regulations including those provisions dealing with vital statistics, the coroner, anatomical gifts, and other laws, rules, and regulations pertaining to the duties of a funeral director. A written outline of the training program, including documented evidence of the training time, place, and participants, shall be maintained in the funeral establishment and shall be available for inspection and comment by an inspector of the bureau.

(b) This section shall not apply to anyone who has successfully passed the funeral director’s examination pursuant to Section 7622.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 429, Sec. 58.   (SB 547)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7636.

(a) (1) Any person who holds or has held, or was named on, any license or registration under the jurisdiction of the bureau that has been, within the immediately preceding 10 years, revoked, suspended, placed on probation, or surrendered under a stipulated decision, and who is employed by, or who seeks employment with, a licensed funeral establishment in any capacity, shall inform the managing funeral director of that revocation, suspension, probation, or surrender.

(2) A person subject to this subdivision shall inform the managing funeral director upon application for employment by completing a form that shall be made available by the bureau.

(b) A managing funeral director who is informed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall notify the bureau by submitting the form within 30 days of so being informed. Failure of the managing funeral director to notify the bureau shall be a cause for a warning. A managing funeral director shall not be subject to a warning if his or her failure to notify the bureau is due to a false statement made by an employee.

(c) Any person required to notify the managing funeral director under subdivision (a) who fails to do so or who makes a false statement on the required form shall be subject to disciplinary action if that person is a licensee of the bureau, or that failure or false statement shall be cause
 for denial of a license under Section 480.

(d) For purposes of subdivision (a), the term “named on” applies to a person who was an owner, partner, or corporate officer of an entity that was licensed or registered under the act at the time that entity’s license or registration under the act was revoked, suspended, placed on probation, or surrendered.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 490, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Cemetery Brokerage Regulations [7637. - 7638.]

7637.

This article does not apply to the following cases or to the following persons:

(a) A person acting with reference to an occasional sale of his or her own property.

(b) The regular officers of a cemetery corporation holding a certificate of authority acting with reference to the corporation’s property when they receive no special compensation therefor.

(c) Persons making an occasional sale under a
 duly executed power of attorney from others.

(d) The services rendered by an attorney at law in performing his or her duties in that capacity.

(e) A receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, any person acting under orders of any court, or a trustee selling under a deed of trust.

(f) A real estate broker or real estate salesperson, acting in that capacity in connection with the sale, lease, or exchange of real property, or interest therein, when the transfer of cemetery property is purely incidental to the sale, lease, or exchange of real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 18.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7637.1.

A person shall not engage in the business of, act in the capacity of, or advertise or assume to act as, a cemetery broker or cemetery salesperson in this state without first obtaining a license from the bureau.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 18.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7637.2.

Any act other than an occasional sale of buying or selling, leasing, or exchanging cemetery property or interment services of or for another or on his or her own account, or offering for another or for his or her own account to buy or sell, lease, or exchange cemetery property or interment services, or negotiating the purchase or sale, lease, or exchange of cemetery property or interment services, or negotiating the purchase or sale, lease, or exchange, or listing or soliciting, or negotiating a loan on or leasing of cemetery property or interment services constitutes the person making such offer, sale or purchase, lease, or exchange, or negotiating the loan, or listing or soliciting, a cemetery broker or cemetery salesperson.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 18.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7637.3.

A person engaged in the business or acting in the capacity of a cemetery broker or a cemetery salesperson within this state shall not bring or maintain any action in the courts of this state for the collection of compensation for the performance of any of the acts mentioned in this article without alleging and proving that he or she was a duly licensed cemetery broker or cemetery salesperson at the time the alleged cause of action arose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 18.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7637.4.

(a) A cemetery broker shall not employ or compensate, directly or indirectly, any person for performing any of the acts within the scope of this article who is not a licensed cemetery broker, or a cemetery salesperson licensed under the cemetery broker employing or compensating him or her. A cemetery salesperson shall not be employed by or accept compensation from any person other than the cemetery broker under whom he or she is at the time licensed.

(b) A salesperson shall not pay any compensation for performing any of the acts within the scope of this article to any licensee except through the cemetery
 broker under whom he or she is at the time licensed.

(c) For a violation of any of the provisions of this section, the bureau may temporarily suspend or permanently revoke the license of the cemetery licensee in accordance with the provisions of this act relating to disciplinary proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 18.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7637.5.

(a) It is a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense, for any person, whether obligor, escrowholder, or otherwise, to pay or deliver to anyone a compensation for performing any of the acts within the scope of this article who is not known to be or who does not present evidence to such payer that he or she is a licensed cemetery broker at the time compensation is earned.

(b) For violation of any of the provisions of this section, the bureau may temporarily suspend or permanently revoke the license of the cemetery licensee in accordance with the provisions of this
 act relating to disciplinary proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 18.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7637.6.

Any person acting as a cemetery broker or cemetery salesperson without a license, or who advertises so as to indicate he or she is a cemetery broker without being so licensed, is guilty of a misdemeanor. If that person is a corporation, it shall be punished by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 18.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7637.7.

(a) Any cemetery salesperson or cemetery broker who sells, causes to be sold, or offers for sale any cemetery property upon the promise, guarantee, or representation to the purchaser that the same may be resold or repurchased at a financial profit is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) For violation of any of the provisions of this section, the bureau may temporarily suspend or permanently revoke the license of the cemetery salesperson or cemetery broker in accordance with the provisions of this act relating to disciplinary proceedings.

(c) No violation of any of the provisions of this section by any cemetery salesperson or employee of any licensed cemetery broker shall cause the suspension or revocation of the license of the employer of the salesperson or employee unless it appears upon a hearing by the bureau that the employer had guilty knowledge of the violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 18.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7637.8.

Every officer, agent, or employee of any company, and every other person who knowingly authorizes, directs, or aids in the publication, advertisement, distribution, or circulation of any false statement or representation concerning any cemetery or cemetery brokerage business and every person who, with knowledge that any advertisement, pamphlet, prospectus, or letter concerning any cemetery brokerage business or any written statement that is false or fraudulent, issues, circulates, publishes, or distributes the same, or causes it to be issued, circulated, published, or distributed, or who in any other respect willfully violates or fails, omits, or neglects to obey, observe, or comply with any order, permit, decision, demand, or requirement of the bureau
 under the provisions of this act relating to cemetery brokerage, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and, if a cemetery licensee, he or she shall be held to trial by the bureau for a suspension or revocation of his or her cemetery license, as provided in the provisions of this act relating to disciplinary proceedings.
